Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-127
Unjust discrimination and practices; violations; penalties.

Any common carrier, shipper, or consignee who willfully violates any provision of section 75-126 shall be guilty of a Class I misdemeanor. Any officer, agent, or employee who, for or on behalf of any common carrier, shipper, or consignee, willfully violates any provision of section 75-126 shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor. Each day of violation shall constitute a separate offense.

Laws 1963, c. 425, art. I, § 27, p. 1365;

Laws 1971, LB 843, § 1;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 198;

Laws 1994, LB 414, § 42.